Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.180

Plea of not guilty.

The plea of not guilty is a denial of every material allegation in the indictment or information; and all matters of fact may be given in evidence under it, except a former conviction or acquittal.

[ 1891 c 28 s 59; Code 1881 s 1058; RRS s 2112.]